Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-929
Licensed insurer; violation.

Any violation of section 68-928 by a licensed insurer shall be subject to the Unfair Insurance Claims Settlement Practices Act.

Laws 2005, LB 589, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,2005, § 68-10,103;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 29.

Unfair Insurance Claims Settlement Practices Act, see section 44-1536.